Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 2

Plans for Street and Highway Systems

54-18-201. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the board of adjustment required by this part, a board of zoning appeals designated to act as a board of adjustment, a county board of adjustment, and a municipal board of adjustment;

“Building” means any building, structure or improvement of any kind or part of the building, structure or improvement that through erection, construction, reconstruction, addition or alteration in any manner becomes a part of the realty;

“Chief executive” means the mayor of a municipality and the county mayor;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of transportation;

“County” means, with respect to residency requirements of officers or to territorial jurisdiction, the area within the county outside municipalities;

“County register” means the register of deeds of the county, and the register of deeds of the county in which a municipality is located;

“Highway” means any public way or part of the public way, including, but not limited to, a street, avenue, highway, or road. For a county, the public ways in the territory outside the boundaries of municipalities; for municipalities, the public ways within their corporate boundaries;

“Legislative body” means the board or body in which the general legislative powers of a county or municipality are vested; the county legislative body, county council, county commission or other body to which most or all county functions or powers are delegated; city council, board of mayor and aldermen, board of commissioners or other body to which most or all municipal functions or powers are delegated;

“Municipality” means an incorporated city or town. With respect to residency requirements of officers or to territorial jurisdiction, “municipality” means the area within the corporate limits of a municipality;

“Ordinance” means the form of action of the municipal legislative body in exercising the powers under this part;

“Planning commission” means the duly constituted planning commission of the county or municipality; for a county, the regional planning commission; for a municipality, the municipal planning commission or regional planning commission that has been designated a planning commission for a municipality; and

“Resolution” means the form of action of the county legislative body in exercising the powers under this part.

Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1965, ch. 251, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A., §§ 54-2201, 54-19-101; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Cooperative planning agreements, title 54, ch. 18, part 1.

Regional planning commission platting authority — Standardizing lots — Recording plat by county register, § 13-3-402.

Submission of subdivision plats to commission for approval — Filing and recording, § 13-4-302.

Collateral References. Highways
97.1 et seq.

54-18-202. Grant of power — Highway maps.

Counties and municipalities are authorized under the conditions and procedures in this part to develop, establish, and preserve plans for coordinated, efficient and economic highway systems through the adoption and amendment of official highway maps.

Acts 1965, ch. 251, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 54-2202, 54-19-102.

54-18-203. Objectives in adopting official map.

The objectives in adopting and amending official maps shall be to:

Protect private property rights and values;

Provide a means by which private construction and development may anticipate highway location and relocation, and thus prevent the loss in property values and private investment that would otherwise result in uncoordinated public and private development;

Avoid the waste of public funds resulting from relocation of unplanned highways or the maintenance of unneeded highways;

Avoid the waste of public funds resulting from the condemnation of buildings and structures constructed without regard to planned highway construction; and

Provide a means of coordination and cooperation between highway development and private development in order to reduce waste of physical, human, economic and financial resources.

Acts 1965, ch. 251, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 54-2203, 54-19-103.

54-18-204. Certification of official map.

After the preparation of a master plan or at least a major street plan, the planning commission may make studies or surveys of new, extended, widened, or narrowed highways, or of the vacation or abandonment of highways, and may make and certify to the legislative body a map of the area studied or surveyed that shall show the recommended future highways, extensions, widenings, narrowings, or abandonments, including any state and federal highway or abandonment proposed by the commissioner.

The certified map shall show the location of existing highways and highways on plats of subdivisions that have been approved by the planning commission.

Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1965, ch. 251, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., §§ 54-2204, 54-19-104; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

54-18-205. Public hearing — Notice.

Upon receipt of the certified map, the legislative body shall hold a public hearing on the map, notice of the time and place of which shall be given no less than fifteen (15) days prior to the time fixed for the hearing by one (1) publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or municipality.

The notice shall state the place at which the proposed official map may be examined.

Acts 1965, ch. 251, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 54-2205, 54-19-105.

54-18-206. Adoption and amendment of official map.

After the public hearing, the legislative body may adopt, by resolution or ordinance, the map as certified by the planning commission as the official map.

Any proposed addition, change or modification of the certified map that is not in accordance with the major highway plan shall be submitted to the planning commission for its approval before any decision by the legislative body on the addition, change or modification.

The planning commission shall have thirty (30) days after the submission within which to send its report to the legislative body.

In the event of the commission's disapproval, the addition, change or modification shall require the favorable vote of a majority of the entire membership of the legislative body.

Amendments of the official map shall be made in the manner required for original adoption.

Acts 1965, ch. 251, § 6; T.C.A., §§ 54-2206, 54-19-106.

54-18-207. Publication and registration.

Notice of any resolution or ordinance adopting an official map, or making any change, addition or modification of the map, shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation, and the resolution or ordinance shall not be in force until a notice of the resolution or ordinance is published.

The notice shall state the substance of the resolution or ordinance and specify where a map of the area under consideration may be examined by the public.

The legislative body shall record the official map as adopted in the office of the county register.

Acts 1965, ch. 251, § 7; T.C.A., §§ 54-2207, 54-19-107.

54-18-208. Streets not accepted — Acquisition — Removal from map.

The making or certifying of a map by the planning commission or the adoption or amendment of an official map by the legislative body shall not constitute the opening or establishment of any highway or the taking or acceptance of any land for highway purposes.

Any highway placed on the official map shall be removed from the map unless the governing body or the department of transportation, as the case may be, has begun acquisition of right-of-way, begun the construction of the highway, or begun the widening or other planned improvement of the highway within the following time limits:

In the case of federal interstate and defense highways, by the end of 1972;

In the case of other state highways, a period of seven (7) years; or

In the case of local highways, a period of three (3) years.

Upon adoption of an official map, the advance acquisition of rights-of-way for those streets on the official map shall proceed as expeditiously as feasible.

Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1965, ch. 251, § 8; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., §§ 54-2208, 54-18-209; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

54-18-209. Fund for advance acquisition of rights-of-way.

From and after the adoption of an official map, the legislative body may establish, by resolution or ordinance, a fund for the advance acquisition of rights-of-way for highways of the county or municipality shown on the official map. In establishing the fund, any revenues may be used that are available for highway purposes, including the state-shared motor fuel and gasoline taxes.

Taxes may be levied for the purpose of establishing and maintaining the fund and bonds may be issued for the purpose of establishing and maintaining the fund in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as bonds are authorized to be issued for highway purposes.

State and federal highways shown on the official map shall be given appropriate consideration in the expenditure of available state or federal funds for the acquisition of rights-of-way.

Acts 1965, ch. 251, § 16; T.C.A., §§ 54-2209, 54-19-109.

54-18-210. Public utilities in streets.

Except utilities in highways at the time of the adoption of the official map, no public water facilities, sewer, or other public utility or improvement shall be constructed in any highway unless shown on the official map or as may be otherwise authorized in title 13, chapter 4, part 3, or the subdivision regulations of a municipality.

Nothing contained in this section or in any other section of this chapter shall be construed to affect any right of a public utility otherwise acquired to cross over or under any highway with its facilities, whether or not the highway is on the official map.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to affect any right of a public utility otherwise acquired to locate its facilities upon or along the highway in such a manner as not to interfere with the use or proposed use of the street or highway, whether or not the highway is on the official map.

Acts 1965, ch. 251, § 17; T.C.A., §§ 54-2210, 54-19-110.

54-18-211. Permits to build within boundaries of mapped highway or abandoned highway.

After the adoption of the official map, no building shall be constructed within the boundaries of a mapped highway nor on a highway shown on the map as a proposed abandonment or relocation until a permit has been obtained, except that building construction may be undertaken without a permit, in order that private property rights are fully protected pursuant to this part.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as relating to buildings directly concerned with strict and specific agricultural enterprises or uses of land.

Acts 1965, ch. 251, § 9; T.C.A., §§ 54-2211, 54-19-111.

54-18-212. Board of adjustment.

Applications for permits to build within mapped highways or on highways proposed for abandonment shall be made to a board of adjustment to be appointed by the legislative body. The application shall contain adequate information concerning the location and nature of the building or improvement to be constructed.

The board of adjustment, except as provided in this section, shall be composed of five (5) members who shall be residents of the county or municipality and who shall hold no other public office, either elective or appointive. Members shall be appointed by the chief executive, with the approval of the legislative body, for five-year terms of office. Members shall serve without compensation. The legislative body may remove any member for cause upon written charges and after public hearing. Vacancies shall be filled for unexpired terms in the same manner as in the case of the original appointments.

The board shall adopt appropriate rules of organization and procedure, which shall include provisions dealing with the selection of officers and employees deemed necessary, the holding of regular meetings and the keeping of a public record.

The board may incur expenses for the performance of its duties within the budget appropriated by the legislative body for those purposes, and an application fee to be determined by the legislative body shall be charged and shall accompany each application when submitted.

In lieu of establishing a board of adjustment, the legislative body may designate an existing board of zoning appeals as a board of adjustment.

Acts 1965, ch. 251, § 10; T.C.A., §§ 54-2212, 54-19-112.

54-18-213. Notice and hearing on permit application.

Before issuing a permit, the board shall hold a public hearing on each application, proper notice of the time and place of which shall be given by fifteen (15) days' notice to the applicant by mail at the address specified in the application and to other interested persons by publication for at least one (1) day in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or municipality.

Notice also shall be given to the chief executive officer on all matters involving the official map and to the commissioner on those matters involving state or federal highways on the official map.

The board shall act upon an application for a permit within forty (40) days of its receipt by the board.

Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1965, ch. 251, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., §§ 54-2213, 54-19-113; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

54-18-214. Granting of permits.

The board shall grant a permit for the construction of a building within the boundaries of a mapped highway or on a highway shown on the map proposed for abandonment when the board finds that the building will not substantially destroy the objectives of the official map.

Acts 1965, ch. 251, § 12; T.C.A., §§ 54-2214, 54-19-114.

54-18-215. Delay in granting permits.

Should the board find and by resolution declare that the construction of a building will substantially destroy the objectives of the official map, the board may delay the granting of a permit for a period not to exceed forty (40) days from the date of adoption of the resolution, during which time the board shall be given a further opportunity to negotiate with the applicant and attempt to reach agreement, to be specified in a permit, as to the location, area, height, character and other details of the proposed construction so that the objectives of the official map may be met.

During this period, the proper highway officials may also negotiate for the purchase of the property or prepare for condemnation.

After the expiration of the forty (40) days, the board shall issue the permit unconditionally; or in the event the board refuses to issue the permit upon demand, the applicant may construct the building without the permit required by this part to ensure preservation of property rights.

However, any building costing less than three thousand dollars ($3,000) shall receive a permit to become effective forty (40) days after receipt of the application by the board, and the hearing specified in § 54-18-213 shall not be held in connection with the applications for the permits.

Acts 1965, ch. 251, § 13; T.C.A., §§ 54-2215, 54-19-115.

54-18-216. Expiration of permit.

Unless the owner proceeds to take the permit within thirty (30) days following the expiration of the forty-day period and proceeds with the construction of the building or structure in accordance with the provisions of the permit within a period of twelve (12) months, then the owner shall not be entitled to build the building or structure without filing a new application with the board.

Acts 1965, ch. 251, § 14; T.C.A., §§ 54-2216, 54-19-116.

54-18-217. Judicial review.

A judicial review of the decision of the board of adjustment shall be available under title 27, chapter 9.

Acts 1965, ch. 251, § 15; T.C.A., §§ 54-2217, 54-19-117.

54-18-218. Penalties for unlawful building.

The owner, lessee, tenant, or person otherwise in control of any land located within the lines of any mapped highway as shown on an official map, or the agent of the owner, lessee, tenant or controller who erects or constructs on the land any building contrary to or in violation of any provision of this part commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Each and every month during which the illegal building, structure or part of the building or structure continues is a separate offense.

Acts 1965, ch. 251, § 19; T.C.A., §§ 54-2218, 54-19-118; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

54-18-219. Buildings not on existing or mapped streets.

The legislative body may provide by resolution or ordinance that no permit for the erection of any building shall be issued, unless a highway giving access to the proposed building existed and was established by law as a public highway at the time of the establishment of the official map in accordance with this part; provided, that the resolution or ordinance shall contain a provision whereby the applicant for the permit may appeal to the board of adjustment provided for in § 54-18-212, hearing upon the appeal and notice of which shall be held and given as provided in this part, and the board shall have the authority to authorize a permit, subject to conditions the board may impose, where the circumstances of the case do not require the proposed building to be related to existing streets or to streets shown on the official map, and where the permit would not tend to distort or increase the difficulty of carrying out the official map or master plan of the county or municipality.

Acts 1965, ch. 251, § 18; T.C.A., §§ 54-2219, 54-19-119.

54-18-220. Supplementary nature of part — Counties and cities to which applicable.

This part shall not be construed as repealing or impairing any provision of any special or private act relating to the regulation of buildings in mapped highways, and all the provisions of the private act shall remain in full force and effect; but insofar as this part is not inconsistent with the special or private act, this part shall apply to the powers and authorities of the county or municipality.

This part shall apply to counties and cities within counties having a population of not less than three hundred seventy-five thousand (375,000), according to the 1960 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

This part shall apply to counties with a population in excess of two hundred thousand (200,000).

Acts 1965, ch. 251, § 20; T.C.A., §§ 54-2220, 54-19-120; T.C.A. § 54-18-221.

Code Commission Notes.

Subsection (c) was transferred from § 54-18-221 by the code commission in 2008.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

54-18-221. [Transferred.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 54-18-221 (Acts 1965, ch. 251, § 21(a); T.C.A., §§ 54-2221, 54-19-121), concerning counties to which the part is applicable, was transferred to § 54-18-220(c) by the code commission in 2008.